District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1945

Double salaries — Custodial employees in District.

Repealed.

History

July 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 467, ch. 467
Aug. 19, 1964, 78 Stat. 491, Pub. L. 88-448, title IV, § 401(k)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 16, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1010.
1973 Ed., § 31-631a.